Massachusetts, session 194th, S1845.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 94 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is
hereby amended by inserting after the words "Massachusetts military reservation fire
department", in line 17, the following words:- , 911 emergency telecommunicators.
of 1